src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"^V:a"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! Old names:
! 1. "Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
! 2. "Vow copying in partitive of words ending in io, ia, ua"
! 3. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 1"
! 4. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 2"
! 5. "Vow copying of a in partitive after vowel sequences"
%^V:a <=>    Vow a: (Dial:)           %> h  _ [ n: | m: ] ; ! 1. !maahan
           :Cns  a  (Dial:)           %>    _ ; ! 1. ! [ .#. | #: | %> ] ; !heinää
      :Cns [i|u] a (Dial:)           %>    _ ; ! 2.
                 a: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h  _   %^V:  ; ! 3.
                 a: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h %^V:  _  ; ! 4.
                                [e|i|:Cns] a %> _ ; ! 5.

!! **Tests:**

!!€ maa>h^Vn
!!€ maa>han

"^V:ä"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! Old names:
! 1. "Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
! 2. "Vow copying in partitive of words ending in io, ia, ua"
! 3. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 1"
! 4. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 2"
! 5. "Vow copying of ä in partitive after vowel sequences"
%^V:ä <=>    Vow ä: (Dial:)           %> h  _ [ n: | m: ] ; ! 1. !jäähän
           :Cns  ä  (Dial:)           %>    _ ; ! 1. ! [ .#. | #: | %> ] ; !heinää
      :Cns [i|u] ä (Dial:)           %>    _ ; ! 2.
                 ä: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h  _   %^V:  ; ! 3.
                 ä: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h %^V:  _  ; ! 4.
                                [e|i|:Cns] ä %> _ ; ! 5.

!! **Tests:**

!!€ jää>h^Vn
!!€ jää>hän

"^V:i"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! 1. "Vow copying of i in partitive after vowel sequences"
! 2. "Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
! 3. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 1"
! 4. "Vow copying in long h sg forms 2"
! 5. "Vow copying in long h pl forms"
%^V:i <=> y i %> _ ; ! 1.
          i2: %> _ ; ! 1.
   Vow  i: (Dial:) %> h _ [ n: | m: ] ; ! 2.
  :Cns  i  (Dial:) %>   _ ; ! 2. ![ .#. | #: | %> ] ;
 i: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h  _   %^V:  ; ! 3.
 i: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h %^V:  _  ; ! 4.
 i: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h _ %>  i2:i ; ! 5. ! TODO This interferes with aikhoin aika^Por^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2n -> aik0000>ho>in

!! **Tests:**
!!€ poi6ka^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2
!!€ poik000>hi>i
!!€ kuva^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2
!!€ kuv000>hi>i

"^V:o"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! 1. "Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
%^V:o <=> Vow o: (Dial:) %> h _ [n:|m:] ; ! 1.
         :Cns o  (Dial:) %>   _ ; ! 1. ![ .#. | #: | %> ] ;







!! ####  (the old system) 
!! with variables (Vx/Vy) instead of each vowel separately

"Back harmony for %^A: %^O: %^U:"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 Vx:Vy <=> BackVow: NonFront:* (NonFront:*) (:NonFront) NonFront:* NonFront:* NonFront:* ([ NonFront: | :NonFront ]) NonFront:* _ ;
          [#:|.#.]  Cns    (RoundedVow) [u|o]  (i6:)                        Cns  a: %^AO:0 %> i2:i %> n _  ;
    where Vx in ( %^A %^O %^U )
          Vy in (   a   o   u )
         matched ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ kulke>^A
!!€ kulke>a


!! ### Vow copying and metathesis

"Vow copying in short h-illative and short partitive sg"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 %^V:Vx <=>  Vow Vx: (Dial:) %> h _ [ n: | m: ] ; ! maahan
           :Cns  Vx  (Dial:) %>   _ ; ![ .#. | #: | %> ] ; ! heinää
    where Vx in ( u y ä ö ) ;

!! **Tests:**

!!€ heinä>^V
!!€ heinä>ä
!!€ syksy>^V
!!€ syksy>y



"Vow copying in partitive of words ending in io, ia"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 %^V:Vx <=> :Cns i Vx (Dial:) %> _ ;
            where Vx in ( o ä ö ) ;


"Vow copying in long h sg forms both part one and part two"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 %^V:Vy <=>  Vx: (Dial:0) %^HMETA: %> h      _  %^V: ;
             Vx: (Dial:0) %^HMETA: %> h %^V: _  ;
    where Vx in ( i2 o u y ä ö )
          Vy in ( i  o u y ä ö )
             matched ;
! TODO i2 i should be in ^V:i?


"Vow copying in long h pl forms"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 %^V:Vy <=>  Vx: (Dial:) %^HMETA: %> h _ %>  i2: ; ! TODO This interferes with aikhoin aika^Por^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2n -> aik0000>ho>in
    where Vx in ( e o u y ä ö ) ! i2
          Vy in ( e o u y ä ö ) ! i
              matched ;

! ok in xfst, fails in hfst, for this rule:
!!€ sivakka^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2n
!!€ sivakk000>ho>in
!#:0 s i v a k k a:0 ^AO:0 ^HMETA:0 > h ^V:o > HERE ---> i2:i n #:0
!FAIL: sivakka^AO^HMETA>h^V>i2n : sivakk000>ho>in REJECTED


"a to o and metathesis in h forms in pl of a-stems"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 %^V:o <=> ([ #: | .#. ]) Cns:* (Vow:) [i|e|a|o|u] Cns:* a: (Dial:) (%^AO:) %^HMETA: %> h _ %> i2: ;
                                       ! a:  %^AO:  %^HMETA: %> h _  %> i2: ;

!            :o [Dummy:* - %^HMETA:] %>            _ [ (%>) Cns|.#.] ;
!                    (:Cns)(:Cns) :o %>            _ ;

! Mikä säätö? traaka : traakkhoin sivakka : sivakkhoin
! katto>^V alempi sääntö?
! katto0o

!!€ paivukko>^V
!!€ paivukko>o


!Eli kun ensi tavussa on pyöreä vokaali (esim. -u tai -o), vartalon loppuvokaali jää pois -i (tai vastaavan -j) suffiksin edeltä
!Poika-nominissa on pyöreä vokali -o, siksi poikhiin. Siinä on myös diftonki oi
!Luin, että  u- tai o-alkuisen diftongin jäljessä vartalon loppuvokaali katoaa (esim ruoka: ruokhiin, poika: poikhiin jne)

!Sitte vartalon loppuvokaali muuttu o:ksi, kun vartalon alussa on a-, e- tai i-, esimerkiksi reuna: reunhoin, aika:aikhoin



"Stem deletion in h-illative"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
Vx:0 <=> :SurfaceCns _ (%^E2I:) %^HMETA: %> h [:Vx|i:] ;
         :SurfaceCns _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h [:Vx|i:] ;
         :SurfaceCns _  %^AO:   %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2: ;
         :i          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;
         :e          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;
         :a          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA: %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ;
   where Vx in ( o u y ö ) ; ! removing a, e, ä, i

!! **Tests:**

!!€ syksy^HMETA>h^V^Vn
!!€ syks00>hyyn












!! ### Stem alternation rules
!  ========================

!"Stem shortening for consonant initial suffixes"
! Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t] ;
!     where Vx in ( i ä ) ; ! a, e away




!! ### e rules
!  =========

"e:i in nom.sg. of e-stems and in n_23ia kauhia hopia in Var"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
e:i <=> Cns: (0:Cns) _ (Dial:0) %^E2I:0 [#:|.#.|%> i5: |%> \i2:] ; ! nom.sg of e-stems
        (Cns) Vow (Vow) ([n|l|r]) Cns (Cns:0) _ %^E2I:0 %^¤:0 %> [ %^A: | h ]; ! E2I for e:i hoppe^E2I^¤>^A -> hopia, kauhia in Var

!!€ ove^E2I
!!€ ovi0

! TODO Write more tests, with Cns:0 (specifically k:0) when sorted out which are truly adj.
!!€ kauhe^E2I^¤>^A
!!€ kauhi00>a

"e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 e:0 <=>     (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:) ([%^AO:|%^AE:|%^VDEL:]) (%^WG:)   %> [i3:|i4:] ;
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:) ([%^AO:|%^AE:|%^VDEL:])  %^EDEL:0 %> [t|h]; !here ^WG^AO, but usually ^VDEL^WG. Hmm
  :Vow [:SurfaceCns | Cns:0] Cns:* _ (Dial:0) (%^WG:0)  %> i2: ;! hyksiksi, ja Cns:0->joiksi ! L-context bec of tie>i2 : t0e0i
                              :Cns _ (Dial:0) (%^E2I:0) %> i2: ; ! jok uusine TODO why jok e:0 i2 i n ? And not e:i?
                              :Cns _ (Dial:0) (%^E2I:0) %^HMETA:0 %> h [%^V:|i] ; ! uutheen
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 (%^T0:0) %^E0:0 %> t %^A: ; !taivalta sgpar +tytärtä
             (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 (%^T0:0) %^E0:0 ; ! taival/tytär sgnom and tyven we add e b4 Dial trig.
                              :Cns _  %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t] ;
                                   _ e %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:] ; ! = aShortening of long vowel in front of i
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|u] l _ %> t e n ; ! kielten, puolten
                              [.#.|#] Cns:* [Vow Vow|e] r _ %> t e n ; ! merten, puolten
[.#.|#|%-] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten
![.#.|#] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u [u|o]|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :[l|r] _ %> t e n ; !kielten, merten, puolten
![.#.|#] Cns:* [i [e|i]|u ([u|o])|y y|ä ä|e (e)|a i] :n   _ %> t e n ; !unten, lunten, sienten, lienten

!                      Cns i e :Cns _ %> t e n ; !kielten sienten
!         (Cns) Vow (Vow) Cns:+ _ (Dial:0) %^WG:0 ;

! TODO TODO TODO
! WTF; Toimii Twolc:ssä mutta ei kun kompiloi, miks?
! [ 2/75][FAIL] tyven+A+Sg+Gen => Missing results: tyvenen
! [ 2/75][FAIL] tyven+A+Sg+Gen => Unexpected results: tyvenn
!!€ tyvene^Por^WG>n
!!€ tyvene00>n
! t
! y
! v
! e
! n
! e
! ^Por:0
! ^WG:0
! >
! n
! ACCEPTED
!
! Lexical string ('q' = quit): tyvene^Por^WG>n
! Surface string ('q' = quit): tyven000>n
! t
! y
! v
! e
! n
! e:0
! ^Por:0
! ^WG:0
! >
! n
! REJECTED: "e:0 in consonant stems and illative plural" fails in state 25.


!! **Tests:**

!!€ kiele>ten
!!€ kiel0>ten
!!€ ytime^HMETA>h^V^V>
!!€ ytim00>hee>
!!€ elläime^HMETA>h^V^V>
!!€ elläim00>hee>
!!€ aukaise>i3
!!€ aukais0>i
!!€ vuote^HMETA>hii
!!€ vuos00>hii

"Cns:0 in hoppe- hope-a in Var & Jok"
!! @RULENAME@
 Cx:0 <=> (Cns) Vow (Vow) ([n|l|r]) Cx:  _ e: (%^E2I:0 | %^A2I:0) %^¤:0  %> [ %^A: | i2: | i5: | h ] ;
    where Cx in ( b d f g h j k m p q s w x z p2 k2 ) ; ! E2I is for e:i hopia. We have l and r word, not yet for n but imaginatine :)
    ! TODO We could further restict these Consonants



!! ### i rules
!  =========
!! The -i- rules require different i-s for different POS.

"i:0"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
! 1. "i:0 in par and gen pl of i-stems in plural of i-final diphtong stems in past tense and conditional tense"
! 2. "Stem shortening for consonant initial suffixes"
! 3. i:0 in vanha_n_21 -Por with I0 tag"
! 4. "Stem deletion in h-illative"
! 5. "Shortening of long vowel in front of i"
 i:0 <=> [#:|.#.] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:* (:Cns)              _ (%^WG:) (%^AO:)    %>  :i %> [ %^V: n | %^V: | t t e ] ; ! 1. ! ristien, kväänitten, papiiksi
                               :Cns (Cns:)              _ Dummy:*            %> [ i3:i | i4:i ] ; ! 1. ! leikin, tohtisin, ilvetin
                            [#:|.#.|:Cns] [a|e|o|u|y|ö] _                    %> [i2:|i3:|i ]    ; ! 1.   ! tuoresta0>i2ksi, nai>i2>n
         [#:|.#.] Cns:* Vow:+ Cns:* (:Cns)              _ (%^WG:)            %> i2:i            ; ! 1. ! Note: This shall not work for Ci forms skaramelli
                                                      i _ %^VDEL:0  (Dummy:) %> [s|t]           ; ! 2.
                                                   Cns: _ (%^WG:0) %^AO:0    %> %^I0:0 i2:i %>  ; ! 3. ! TODO Add dialect tags here ! tooline in Var ja Jok. Not tooliine, which is in Por
                                            :SurfaceCns _ (%^E2I:) %^HMETA:  %> h [:i|i:]                    ; ! 4.
                                            :SurfaceCns _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h [:i|i:]                    ; ! 4.
                                            :SurfaceCns _  %^AO:   %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (:o) %> i2:         ; ! 4.
                                            :i          _ (%^AO:)  %^HMETA:  %> h (%^V:) (%>) (:o)(:o) (i2:) ; ! 4.
                                                        _ e %> ([Dummy: - %^AE:]) [ i | i2: | i3: | i4:]     ; ! 5.





!! ### a rules
!  =========
